Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 3 SAVINGS PLANS
23-3.1-307. Limitations.

Nothing in this part 3 shall be construed to:

Give any designated beneficiary any rights or legal interest with respect to an account unless the designated beneficiary is the account owner;

Guarantee that a designated beneficiary will be admitted to an education institution or be allowed to continue enrollment at or graduate from an education institution;

Establish state residency for a beneficiary merely because of the designation as a beneficiary; or

Guarantee that amounts saved pursuant to the program will be sufficient to cover the qualified higher education expenses or qualified disability expenses of a designated beneficiary, as applicable.

Nothing in this part 3 shall establish any obligation of the state of Colorado or any agency or instrumentality of the state of Colorado to guarantee for the benefit of any account owner, contributor to an account, or designated beneficiary any of the following:

The return of any amounts contributed to an account;

The rate of interest or other return on any account;

The payment of interest or other return on any account; or

Tuition rates or the cost of any qualified expenditures.

Nothing in this part 3 shall be construed to indicate that the account is insured by the state of Colorado or that the principal deposited or investment return is guaranteed by the state of Colorado.

(3.5) Nothing in this part 3 shall be construed to create an indebtedness, a debt, or a liability of the state, nor shall the state be liable on the savings contracts, except to the extent of the amounts on deposit in the accounts, nor shall a savings contract constitute the giving, pledging, or loaning of the full faith and credit of the state.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p.1294, § 16, effective May 26, 2000.)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 462, § 1, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 223, § 3, effective March 29.

L. 2000:

(4) amended, p. 223, § 3, effective March 28; entire part amended, p. 1294, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2015:

(1)(d), IP(2), and (2)(d) amended, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1053, § 7, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section in Senate Bill 00-164 and House Bill 00-1276 were harmonized.

23-3.1-307.1. Personal liability.

Neither the members of the board, employees or agents of the authority, nor any person executing savings contracts shall be liable personally on savings contracts or be subject to any personal liability or accountability as a result of the program.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1295, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 574, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1053, § 8, effective June 3.

23-3.1-307.3. Proceeds as trust funds.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 3, all moneys received pursuant to this part 3, including moneys received under savings contracts, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this part 3. Any officer, bank, or trust company with which such moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes of this part 3, subject to such policies and guidelines as the authority and the resolution authorizing the bonds, notes, or other obligations of any issue or the trust agreement securing such obligations provides.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1295, § 16, effective May 26.

23-3.1-307.4. Claims of creditors - exemption.

Except as provided pursuant to section 529A of the internal revenue code, moneys credited to or expended from the savings trust fund by or on behalf of an account owner, depositor, or designated beneficiary of a savings contract made under this part 3, which contract has not been terminated, are exempt from all claims of creditors of the account owner, depositor, designated beneficiary, or the authority.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1295, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1053, § 9, effective June 3.

23-3.1-307.5. Confidentiality of records.

Except as otherwise provided in this section or pursuant to federal law, all data, information, and records relating to the college savings program and the ABLE savings program are public records and are subject to inspection pursuant to the provisions of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

The following data, information, and records relating to the college savings program and the ABLE savings program shall be kept confidential by the authority, and the authority shall deny the right of access to or inspection of such data, information, and records except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:

Data, information and records relating to designated beneficiaries and contributors to an individual trust account or savings account including any records that reveal personally identifiable information about such individuals; except that the authority may disclose such information to an account owner regarding his or her own account;

Trade secrets and proprietary information regarding software, including programs and source codes, utilized or owned by the authority; and

Marketing plans and the results of market surveys conducted by the authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the authority may disclose and may provide the right of access to or inspection of any data, information, or records to agents or representatives of professionals with whom the authority has contracted, to the department of revenue, or to the state treasurer, or to other third parties if the account owner and designated beneficiary have consented in writing to such disclosure.

No cause of action shall arise against a person for disclosing confidential information in violation of subsection (2) of this section unless the act or omission giving rise to the cause of action was intentional or grossly negligent.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 222, § 2, effective March 29; entire part amended, p. 1295, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 574, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1) and IP(2) amended, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1053, § 10, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

This section was added by House Bill 00-1276 and harmonized with Senate Bill 00-164.

23-3.1-307.9. Policies for promotion and disclosure of program information.

The authority shall design a policy related to the promotion of the program and a policy related to the disclosure of program-related information to account owners, depositors, and designated beneficiaries in a manner consistent with this part 3 and consistent with the requirements of section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable, in order to require that:

Promotional material and program-related information disclose that no moneys invested in the program are insured by the state of Colorado and that neither the principal deposited nor the investment returned is guaranteed by the state of Colorado; and

Any fees paid from moneys collected pursuant to this part 3 are disclosed in promotional material and program-related information provided to the public and to account owners, depositors, and designated beneficiaries.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1295, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2015:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1053, § 11, effective June 3.

23-3.1-308. Residency.

Both Colorado resident and nonresident account owners and designated beneficiaries are eligible to participate in and benefit from the college savings program. Only Colorado resident account owners and beneficiaries, and account owners and beneficiaries who are residents in any state which contracts with the authority under section 23-3.1-311, are eligible to participate in and benefit from the ABLE savings program, unless otherwise provided under section 529A of the internal revenue code.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 463, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1296, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1054, § 12, effective June 3.

23-3.1-309. Tax exemption.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amount of any distribution to a designated beneficiary, as defined in section 529 (e)(1) of the internal revenue code, from a college savings program account established under this part 3 shall be exempt from state income taxation to the extent that this income is used to pay qualified higher education expenses of the designated beneficiary.

To the extent that distributions from an ABLE savings program account established pursuant to this part 3 to a designated beneficiary for qualified disability expenses are excluded from taxable income pursuant to section 529A of the internal revenue code, or any successor provision, such distributions are also excluded from state taxable income.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 463, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1296, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1054, § 13, effective June 3.

23-3.1-310. Job retraining cash fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-202), ch. 396, p. 1883, § 6, effective June 9.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2013. (See L. 2010, p. 1883.)

23-3.1-311. Achieving a better life experience (ABLE) savings program - establishment - authority - powers - duties.

The authority shall establish and implement the achieving a better life experience (ABLE) savings program in Colorado that complies with the federal ABLE act and section 529A of the internal revenue code, or any successor section, and regulations implementing that section to allow for an account owner to save for qualified disability expenses without disqualifying the account owner from certain federal benefits. The ABLE savings program shall be administered pursuant to the provisions of this part 3 that are consistent with section 529A of the internal revenue code. In addition to any other powers and duties specifically granted to the authority in this part 3 and in part 2 of this article, as applicable to the ABLE savings program, the authority shall:

Adopt any guidelines and procedures that are necessary to administer the ABLE savings program;

Make any necessary changes to the ABLE savings program to obtain or maintain federal income tax benefits or treatment provided by section 529A of the internal revenue code and exemptions under federal securities laws;

Operate the ABLE savings program through the use of accounts pursuant to the provisions of section 23-3.1-306 as they apply to the ABLE savings program; and

Implement the ABLE savings program through the use of one or more financial institutions to act as managers pursuant to the provisions of section 23-3.1-305 as they apply to the ABLE savings program.

For purposes of implementing the ABLE savings program, the authority may invest amounts on deposit in accounts established pursuant to this section with other accounts established in this part 3 that are qualified accounts pursuant to section 529 of the internal revenue code.

If permitted under federal law, the authority may:

Contract with a state that does not have a qualified ABLE savings program pursuant to section 529A of the internal revenue code to provide residents of that state access to Colorado's ABLE savings program; and

Contract with a state that has a qualified ABLE savings program to provide residents of Colorado access to that state's program.

Nothing in this article prevents the authority from complying with its duty to conform the program to federal requirements for a qualified ABLE savings program under section 529A of the internal revenue code.

[Editor's note: Subsection (5) is effective January 1, 2023.] Upon the death of an ABLE savings program designated beneficiary, the state shall not file a claim against the deceased designated beneficiary's ABLE savings program account as authorized in section 529A (f) of the internal revenue code, unless the filing of such a claim is required to maintain qualified ABLE savings program status under section 529A of the internal revenue code.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1046, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2022:

(5) added, (HB 22-1320), ch. 241, p. 1783, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.